Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska16-252
County jail; use by city; compensation.

Any city of the first class shall have the right to use the jail of the county for the confinement of such persons as may be imprisoned under the ordinances of such city. The city shall be liable to the county for the cost of keeping such prisoners as provided by section 47-120.

Laws 1901, c. 18, § 95, p. 296;

R.S.1913, § 4869;

C.S.1922, § 4037;

C.S.1929, § 16-254;

Laws 1937, c. 85, § 1, p. 282;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 16-254;

R.S.1943, § 16-252;

Laws 1961, c. 40, § 1, p. 168;

Laws 1989, LB 4, § 1.

For additional provisions relating to city jails and joint county and city jails, see sections 47-201 to 47-208 and 47-302 to 47-308.